Utah, session 2026, SB142.
Section 1. Section 58-50-9 is amended to read:58-50-9. Standards of conduct for private probation providers -- Contracts -- Reports.(1)As used in this section, "licensee" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-2-101"human services program" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-2-101.(2)The private probation provider:(a)shall maintain impartiality toward all parties;(b)shall ensure that all parties understand the nature of the process, the procedure, the particular role of the private probation provider, and the parties' relationship to the private probation provider;(c)(i)shall maintain confidentiality or, in cases where confidentiality is not protected, the private probation provider shall so advise the parties; or(ii)if the law does not protect confidentiality, shall advise the parties that confidentiality is not protected;(d)shall:(i)disclose any circumstance that may create or give the appearance of a conflict of interest and any circumstance that may reasonably raise a question as to the private probation provider's impartiality; and(ii)if the contract probation supervisor perceives or believes a conflict of interest to exist, the contract probation supervisor shall refrain from entering into those probation services;(d)(i)shall disclose any circumstance that may create or give the appearance of a conflict of interest and any circumstance that may reasonably raise a question as to the private probation provider's impartiality; and(ii)if the contract probation provider believes a conflict of interest may exist, shall refrain from providing into those probation services;(e)shall adhere to the standards regarding private probation services adopted by the licensing board adopts;(f)shall:(i)comply with orders of court and perform services as directed by judges in individual cases; and(ii)notify the court that the private probation provider is providing supervision services to a defendant;(f)(i)shall comply with the orders of a court with jurisdiction; and(ii)shall notify the court that the private probation provider is providing supervision services to a defendant;(g)shall perform duties established underin accordance with Section 77-18-105, as ordered by the courta court with jurisdiction orders;(h)beginning July 1, 2022, may not provide private probation in a county where an agency of local government provides probation services unless the private probation provider has entered into a contract with the agency of local governmentshall provide private probation in a county where an agency of local government provides probation services only if the private probation provider has entered into a contract with the agency of local government;(i)shall provide a report each month to each county sheriff where the private probation provider provides private probation identifying:(i)each individual currently supervised in the county by in the county that the private probation provider currently supervises;(ii)the crimes each supervised individual supervised committed;(iii)the level of supervision that is being provided for each individualthe private probation provider provides for each supervised individual; and(iv)any other information related to the provision of private probation that:(A) the county sheriff determines is relevant; and(B)complies with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d et seq.; and(j)may not solicit defendants as supervision clients on any property that operates as a court of justice as described in Section 78A-1-101.; and(k)may not simultaneously provide to a defendant private probation services and other services for which the private probation provider receives compensation from a human services program.(3)If, after conducting a screening of a defendant's risk and needs, a private probation provider determines that a defendant requires a specific assessment, treatment, or other services, the private probation provider shall:(a)provide the defendant a list of all available licenseeseach available human services program that provideprovides the assessment, treatment, or other services; and(b)permit the defendant to select a licensee described inhuman services program in accordance with Subsection (3)(a) with which to complete the required assessment, treatment, or other services.(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), a private probation provider that is a licensee may not simultaneously provide to a defendant private probation services and other services for which the private probation provider receives compensationa human services program may not simultaneously provide to a defendant private probation services and other services for which the human services program receives compensation, including:(i)mental health therapy services;(ii)education services; or(iii)rehabilitation services.(b)A private probation provider that is a licensee may simultaneously provideA human services program may simultaneously provide to a defendant private probation services and other services as described in Subsection (4)(a) if:(i)no other licensees that provide the services are locatedhuman services program that provides the services is located within 50 miles of the defendant's residence; and(ii)the private probation provider obtains the defendant's written informed consent.(c)The written informed consent described in Subsection (4)(b) shall include:(i)a description of the services other than private probation servicesa separate paragraph describing what services beyond private probation services that the private probation provider willmay provide;(ii)a separate paragraph describing how the defendant can withdraw consent;(iii)a separate paragraph describing grievance procedures, including how to contact and file a complaint with the division's investigation office; and(iv)a separate paragraph informing the defendant of the potential conflict of interest.(d)The division shall revoke the license of a private probation provider who violates Subsection (4)(a).(5)A contract described in Subsection (2)(h) shall include a description of the fees the private probation provider will charge a defendant who is supervised by the private probation provider supervises.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.